Nevada, session 83, AB370.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 690C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. The Division shall establish a toll-free telephone
number for receiving complaints from consumers concerning the
manner in which a provider is handling a claim on a service
contract. The Division shall post the toll-free telephone number on
the Internet website of the Division.
Sec. 3. 1. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations
establishing a system for rating each provider doing business in
this State on the compliance by the provider with the provisions of
this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto and the
number of complaints received by the Division concerning the
provider. The regulations must:
(a) Require the rating system to provide for the assignment of
a star rating of not more than five stars and not less than one star
to each provider.
(b) Set forth the methods and procedures by which the
Commissioner will evaluate the compliance of the provider with
the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted
pursuant thereto and the number of complaints received by the
Division concerning the provider for the purpose of assigning a
star rating to the provider.
(c) Provide for a new evaluation to be conducted of and a new
star rating to be assigned to each provider periodically in
accordance with a schedule prescribed by the Commissioner.
(d) Set forth procedures by which a provider may appeal a star
rating assigned to the provider.
2. The Division shall post on the Internet website of the
Division the most recent star rating assigned to each provider
doing business in this State pursuant to the regulations adopted
pursuant to subsection 1.
-
*AB370*

– 3 –
Sec. 4. NRS 690C.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
690C.260 1. A service contract must:
(a) Be written in language that is understandable and printed in a
typeface that is easy to read.
(b) Indicate that it is insured by a contractual liability insurance
policy if it is so insured, and include the name and address of the
issuer of the policy or that it is backed by the full faith and credit of
the provider if the service contract is not insured by a contractual
liability insurance policy.
(c) Include the amount of any deductible that the holder is
required to pay.
(d) Include the name and address of the provider and, if
applicable:
(1) The name and address of the administrator; and
(2) The name of the holder, if provided by the holder.
 The names and addresses of such persons are not required to be
preprinted on the service contract and may be added to the service
contract at the time of the sale.
(e) Include the purchase price of the service contract. The
purchase price must be determined pursuant to a schedule of fees
established by the provider. The purchase price is not required to be
preprinted on the service contract and may be negotiated with the
holder and added to the service contract at the time of sale.
(f) Include a description of the goods covered by the service
contract.
(g) Specify the duties of the provider and any limitations,
exceptions or exclusions.
(h) If the service contract covers a motor vehicle, indicate
whether replacement parts that are not made for or by the original
manufacturer of the motor vehicle may be used to comply with the
terms of the service contract.
(i) Include any restrictions on transferring or renewing the
service contract.
(j) Include the terms, restrictions or conditions for cancelling the
service contract before it expires and the procedure for cancelling
the service contract. The conditions for cancelling the service
contract must include, without limitation, the provisions of
NRS 690C.270.
(k) Include the duties of the holder under the contract, including,
without limitation, the duty to protect against damage to the goods
covered by the service contract or to comply with any instructions
included in the owner’s manual for the goods.
(l) Indicate whether the service contract authorizes the holder to
recover consequential damages.
-
*AB370*

– 4 –
(m) Indicate whether any defect in the goods covered by the
service contract existing on the date the contract is purchased is not
covered under the service contract.
(n) Include a statement, written in plain language and in a
font size that is not smaller than the font size used for the majority
of the text in the service contract, indicating that if the holder is
not satisfied with the manner in which the provider handles a
claim on the contract, the holder may contact the Commissioner
by use of the toll-free telephone number of the Division
established pursuant to section 2 of this act. The statement must
include the current toll-free telephone number established
pursuant to section 2 of this act that is posted on the Internet
website of the Division.
2. A provider shall not allow, make or cause to be made a false
or misleading statement in any of the service contracts of the
provider or intentionally omit a material statement that causes a
service contract to be misleading. The Commissioner may require
the provider to amend any service contract that the Commissioner
determines is false or misleading.
H
-
*AB370*